Utah statutes.
63G-6-705 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Restrictions on state agency procurement of architect-engineer services.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), when a public procurement unit, in accordance with Section 63G-6-701, elects to obtain architect or engineering services by using a competitive procurement process and has provided public notice of its competitive procurement process:

(a)  a higher education entity, or any part of one, may not submit a proposal in response to the public procurement unit's competitive procurement process; and

(b)  the public procurement unit may not award a contract to perform the architect or engineering services solicited in the competitive procurement process to a higher education entity or any part of one.

(2)  A public procurement unit need not comply with the requirements of Subsection (1) when the public procurement unit is procuring architect or engineer services for contracts related to research activities and technology transfer.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

